waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX Q ias     oka             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okos            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okoje           [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    toka            čias
SFX Q čias    tokos           čias
SFX Q čias    tokoje          čias
SFX Q us      oka             us
SFX Q us      okos            us
SFX Q us      okoje           us
SFX Q as      oki             [^i]as
SFX Q as      okų             [^i]as
SFX Q as      okiems          [^i]as
SFX Q as      okus            [^i]as
SFX Q as      okais           [^i]as
SFX Q as      okuose          [^i]as
SFX Q ias     oki             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okų             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okiems          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okus            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okais           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okuose          [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    toki            čias
SFX Q čias    tokų            čias
SFX Q čias    tokiems         čias
SFX Q čias    tokus           čias
SFX Q čias    tokais          čias
SFX Q čias    tokuose         čias
SFX Q us      oki             us
SFX Q us      okų             us
SFX Q us      okiems          us
SFX Q us      okus            us
SFX Q us      okais           us
SFX Q us      okuose          us
SFX Q as      okoms           [^i]as
SFX Q as      okomis          [^i]as
SFX Q as      okose           [^i]as
SFX Q ias     okoms           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okomis          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okose           [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tokoms          čias
SFX Q čias    tokomis         čias
SFX Q čias    tokose          čias
SFX Q us      okoms           us
SFX Q us      okomis          us
SFX Q us      okose           us

SFX R N 146
SFX R 0       s               ti
SFX R ti      davausi         ti
SFX R tis     davausi         tis
SFX R ti      davaisi         ti
SFX R tis     davaisi         tis
SFX R ti      davosi          ti
SFX R tis     davosi          tis
SFX R ti      davomės         ti
SFX R tis     davomės         tis
SFX R ti      davotės         ti
SFX R tis     davotės         tis
SFX R ti      siuosi          [^sšzž]ti
SFX R ti      iuosi           [sš]ti
SFX R zti     siuosi          zti
SFX R žti     šiuosi          žti
SFX R tis     siuosi          [^sšzž]tis
SFX R tis     iuosi           [sš]tis
SFX R ti      siesi           [^sšzž]ti
SFX R ti      iesi            [sš]ti
SFX R zti     siesi           zti
SFX R žti     šiesi           žti
SFX R tis     siesi           [^sšzž]tis
SFX R tis     iesi            [sš]tis
SFX R ti      sis             [^sšzž]ti
SFX R ti      is              [sš]ti
SFX R zti     sis             zti
SFX R žti     šis             žti
SFX R tis     sis             [^sšzž]tis
SFX R tis     is              [sš]tis
SFX R ti      simės           [^sšzž]ti
SFX R ti      imės            [sš]ti
SFX R zti     simės           zti
SFX R žti     šimės           žti
SFX R tis     simės           [^sšzž]tis
SFX R tis     imės            [sš]tis
SFX R ti      sitės           [^sšzž]ti
SFX R ti      itės            [sš]ti
SFX R zti     sitės           zti
SFX R žti     šitės           žti
SFX R tis     sitės           [^sšzž]tis
SFX R tis     itės            [sš]tis
SFX R ti      čiausi          ti
SFX R tis     čiausi          tis
SFX R i       umeisi          ti
SFX R i       umeis           ti
SFX R is      umeisi          tis
SFX R is      umeis           tis
SFX R i       ųsi             ti
SFX R is      ųsi             tis
SFX R i       umėmės          ti
SFX R i       umės            ti
SFX R is      umėmės          tis
SFX R is      umės            tis
SFX R i       umėtės          ti
SFX R i       utės            ti
SFX R is      umėtės          tis
SFX R is      utės            tis
SFX R ti      kis             [^kg]ti
SFX R ti      is              kti
SFX R gti     kis             gti
SFX R tis     kis             [^kg]tis
SFX R tis     is              ktis
SFX R gtis    kis             gtis
SFX R ti      kimės           [^kg]ti
SFX R ti      imės            kti
SFX R gti     kimės           gti
SFX R tis     kimės           [^kg]tis
SFX R tis     imės            ktis
SFX R gtis    kimės           gtis
SFX R ti      kitės           [^kg]ti
SFX R ti      itės            kti
SFX R gti     kitės           gti
SFX R tis     kitės           [^kg]tis
SFX R tis     itės            ktis
SFX R gtis    kitės           gtis
SFX R ti      damasis         ti
SFX R ti      damasi          ti
SFX R tis     damasis         tis
SFX R tis     damasi          tis
SFX R ti      damiesi         ti
SFX R ti      damosi          ti
SFX R tis     damiesi         tis
SFX R tis     damosi          tis
SFX R i       asi             ti
SFX R is      asi             tis
SFX R ti      davusis         ti
SFX R tis     davusis         tis
SFX R 0       si              [aoė]
SFX R a       uosi            a
SFX R o       ausi            o
SFX R asi     uosi            asi
SFX R osi     ausi            osi
SFX R a       iesi            [^i]a
SFX R a       esi             [^čž]ia
SFX R čia     tiesi           čia
SFX R a       esi             [^d]žia
SFX R žia     iesi            džia
SFX R asi     iesi            [^i]asi
SFX R asi     esi             [^čž]iasi
SFX R čiasi   tiesi           čiasi
SFX R asi     esi             [^d]žiasi
SFX R žiasi   iesi            džiasi
SFX R o       aisi            o
SFX R osi     aisi            osi
SFX R 0       mės             [aoė]
SFX R si      mės             [aoė]si
SFX R 0       tės             [aoė]
SFX R si      tės             [aoė]si
SFX R 0       ntis            a
SFX R o       antis           o
SFX R si      ntis            asi
SFX R osi     antis           osi
SFX R 0       masi            [ao]
SFX R si      masi            [ao]si
SFX R ė       iausi           [^dt]ė
SFX R ė       žiausi          dė
SFX R tė      čiausi          tė
SFX R ėsi     iausi           [^dt]ėsi
SFX R ėsi     žiausi          dėsi
SFX R tėsi    čiausi          tėsi
SFX R ė       eisi            ė
SFX R ėsi     eisi            ėsi
SFX R ė       usis            ė
SFX R ėsi     usis            ėsi
SFX R ė       ęsis            ė
SFX R ėsi     ęsis            ėsi
SFX R ė       ęsi             ė
SFX R ėsi     ęsi             ėsi
SFX R ė       usiosi          ė
SFX R ėsi     usiosi          ėsi
SFX R ė       imasis          ė
SFX R ė       imosi           ė
SFX R ė       imuisi          ė
SFX R ė       imąsi           ė
SFX R ė       imusi           ė
SFX R ė       imesi           ė
SFX R ėsi     imasis          ėsi
SFX R ėsi     imosi           ėsi
SFX R ėsi     imuisi          ėsi
SFX R ėsi     imąsi           ėsi
SFX R ėsi     imusi           ėsi
SFX R ėsi     imesi           ėsi
SFX R ė       imaisi          ė
SFX R ė       imųsi           ė
SFX R ėsi     imaisi          ėsi
SFX R ėsi     imųsi           ėsi
